toy.foma
define FinalE %{%.f%.%} -> 0 || [ (C) C C & ~MultiCharC & ~[h h] & ~[(h) h w] ] e "^" _ [ MultiCharC | C ] .o. ! do not drop -e if it results in a CCC cluster
                                                                                                       ! ~[h h] for puughhe(V)^@~fnaqe(V→V) [Badten p.657]
                                                                                                       ! ~[h w] for aaghhwe(V)^@~fyug(V→V)
                   [..] -> e ||              .#. ( MultiCharC | C ) FullVowel _ C e "^" %{%.f%.%}  .o. ! hop final -e
                      e -> 0 ||                 [ ? - .#.] [ MultiCharC | C ] _ "^" %{%.f%.%}      .o. ! drop final -e if it isn't in the first syllable
              %{%.f%.%} -> 0                                                                       ;


define SemiFinalE %{%.sf%.%} -> 0 || [ (C) C C & ~MultiCharC ] e g (h) "^" _                                           .o.
                        [..] -> e ||      .#. ( MultiCharC | C ) FullVowel _ [ MultiCharC | C ] e g (h) "^" %{%.sf%.%} .o.
                           e -> 0 ||        [ ? - .#. ] [ MultiCharC | C ] _ g (h) "^" %{%.sf%.%}                      .o.
                  %{%.sf%.%} -> 0                                                                                      ;


define ShortRootFinalE e -> a || .#. C (C) V C (C) _ "^" %{%.fS%.%} .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.38]
              %{%.fS%.%} -> %{%.f%.%}                               ;


define LongRootFinalE e -> 0 || _ "^" %{%.fL%.%} .o. ! [Jacobson (2001) p.32] 
             %{%.fL%.%} -> 0                     ;


!-------------------------
! CONSONANT-RELATED RULES
!-------------------------

define DropFinalC g h h -> w h   || %{k%} w         "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate ghh- onset to dropped -w
                  g h h -> g g   || g               "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! Intr.Opt.Fut [Jacobson (2001) p.119]
                    g h -> g     || g               "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate gh- onset to dropped -g
                    g h -> g h w || g h w           "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate gh- onset to dropped -ghw
                    g h -> w h   || %{k%} w         "^" %{%.m%.%} _ UnvoicedC         .o. ! assimilate gh- onset to dropped -w
                    g h -> w     || %{k%} w         "^" %{%.m%.%} _ VoicedC           .o. ! assimilate gh- onset to dropped -w
                      g -> g h   || [ g | %{g%} ] h "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ V | C - g - h ] .o. ! assimilate g-  onset to dropped -gh
                      k -> q w   || g h w           "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate k-  onset to dropped -ghw
                      k -> q     || [ g | %{g%} ] h "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate k-  onset to dropped -gh
                      k -> k w   || w               "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate k-  onset to dropped -w
                      q -> k     || g               "^" %{%.m%.%} _ [ ? - .#. ]       .o. ! assimilate q-  onset to dropped -g
                    g g -> g h h ||             g h "^" %{%.m%.%} _                   .o. ! assimilate gg- onset to dropped -gh [Jacobson (2001) p.66]
    [ ~MultiCharC & C ] -> 0     ||                               _ "^" %{%.m%.%}     .o. ! drop root-final consonant
    [ g | %{g%} ] ( h ) -> 0     ||                               _ "^" %{%.m%.%}     .o. ! drop -g in root-final -gh, -gh in -ghw
              %{%.m%.%} -> 0                                                          ;


define DropWeakC %{g%} h -> 0 || _ "^" %{%.w%.%} .o. ! drop weak -gh from the root
               %{%.w%.%} -> 0                    ;


define DropUvular %{g%} h -> 0   || C FullVowel _ "^" %{%.c%.%} [ FullVowel | Allomorph ] .o. ! drop uvular -gh between two single vowels
                      g h -> 0   || C FullVowel _ "^" %{%.c%.%} [ FullVowel | Allomorph ] .o. ! where the second vowel can be a full vowel
                %{%.c%.%} -> 0                                                            ;   ! or an allomorph
 

define VelarUvularRounding       g -> w         ||   [ i | a ] u _ [ C | V - u ] .o. ! velar/uvular rounding [Jacobson (2001) p.30]
                           n g n g -> n g n g w || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o. ! velar/uvular rounding [Jacobson (2001) p.36-37]
                               n g -> n g w     || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o. ! needs to occur before vowel dominance
                             g h h -> g h h w   || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o.
                               g h -> g h w     || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o.
                               g g -> w h       || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o.
                                 k -> k w       || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o.
                                 g -> w         || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   .o.
                                 q -> q w       || [ C | V - u ] _ u [ i | a ]   ;


define DropFinalVC V (C) (h) -> 0 || _ "^" %{%.mm%.%} .o. 
                  %{%.mm%.%} -> 0                     ;


!---------------------------------------
! OTHER / MISC MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES
!---------------------------------------

define VowelDominance a i -> i i  .o.
                      i a -> i i  .o.
                      u i -> i i  .o.
                      i u -> i i  .o.
                      a u -> a a  .o.
                      u a -> a a  .o.
                      i e -> i i  .o. ! e-hopping
                      a e -> a a  .o.
                      u e -> u u  ;


define DeleteEBeforeVowel e -> 0 || _ "^" a .o. ! [Intr][Intrg][1Pl]:%^ste%^a -> %^st%^a
                          e -> 0 || _ "^" i .o. ! [Intr][Opt][2Pl/Du] drop final -e, e.g. aanitek but there is no ~f in these morphemes
                          e -> 0 || _ "^" u ;   ! [Intr][Opt][1Du]:%^ste%u -> %^st%^u


define DropMiddleVowel a -> 0 || V _ V ; ! occurs with the transitive indicative [Jacobson (2001) p.44]


!-------------------
! ALLOMORPHY RULES
!-------------------

define AddE %{E%} -> a || a "^" _ .o.
            %{E%} -> i || i "^" _ .o.
            %{E%} -> u || u "^" _ .o.
            %{E%} -> e || C "^" _ .o.
            %{E%} -> 0            ;


define ResolveG %{G%} -> g || FullVowel ("^") FullVowel "^" _ .o.
                %{G%} -> 0                                    ;


define ResolveI %{I%} -> e ||       g h "^" _ .o. ! for postbase ~sf:(e)sqe [Jacobson (2001) p.64]
                %{I%} -> i || FullVowel "^" _ .o.
                %{I%} -> e || m "^" _         .o. ! for obsolete verb root -ete [Jacobson (2001) p.78]
                %{I%} -> i || n "^" _         .o.
                %{I%} -> 0                    ;


define OptativeAllomorphs %{GI%} -> g i   || FullVowel ("^") FullVowel "^" _ .o. ! -a, -i, -u stems vs. -aa, -ii, -uu roots [Jacobson (2001) p.65]
                          %{GI%} -> 0                                        .o.
                          %{AI%} -> i     ||                       g h "^" _ .o. ! -agh, -igh, -ugh stems vs. -aagh, -iigh, -uugh stems [Jacobson (2001) p.65]
                          %{AI%} -> a     ||                 FullVowel "^" _ ;


define SFGKeKa e -> a || "^" ( %{%.at%.%} | %{%.sf%.%} | %{%.m%.%} | g ) [ k | q ] _ "^" n g   ; ! @~sf–(g)ke/ka [Jacobson (2001) p.72]
!            [..] -> g || "^" ( %{%.at%.%} | %{%.sf%.%} | %{%.m%.%} | g ) [ k | q ] e "^" _ k a ;   ! @~sf–(g)ke/ka [Badten (2008) p.617]


define Uteta e -> a || "^" [ %{%.at%.%} | %{%.sf%.%} | %{%.f%.%} | %{%.c%.%} ] u %{t%} _ "^" [ %{%.f%.%} | %{%.fS%.%} ] n g .o. ! @~:(u)te [Jacobson (2001) p.116]
             e -> a || "^"                                                       %{t%} _ "^" [ %{%.f%.%} | %{%.fS%.%} ] n g .o.
    %{%.at%.%} -> 0 ||                                             [? - g] %{t%} e "^" _ u %{t%} [ e | a ]                  .o. ! drop -te if -gte, otherwise -e [Badten (2008) p.691]
    %{%.at%.%} -> 0 ||                                             [? - g] %{t%} e "^" _ u t k e                            ;   ! also true for postbase ~:(u)tke [Badten (2008) p.691]


! what is %{SUBR%}?
!   in the context of the subordinative mood, postbases @–nghite and ~:(ng)ite rewrite as –gpe and ~f–ngu, respectively.
!   the subordinative mood marker is also +na for these strongly special -te stems, hence a placeholder %{SUBR%}, while the ordinary
!   subordinative mood marker @~flu (or @~fllu) is used with all other special -te stems. lastly, some of the person/number markers
!   are also different for strongly special -te stems, using the subordinative mood marker +na [Jacobson (2001) p.102].
! there's probably a better way to write this tbh, especially the "t e n ^" -> "n g". how do we differentiate "ten" versus "teng"?
